Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2425.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1855.1. Career and Technical Education Curriculum Modernization Grant Program.-- (a) The Career and Technical Education Curriculum Modernization Grant Program is established within the department to provide grants to school entities to purchase, implement and retain either:(1) a digital curriculum instructional platform; or(2) printed or written curriculum that meets the standards for modernizing career and technical education in this 1234567891011121314151617181920 Commonwealth.(b) Grants awarded under the program shall be distributed upon application by eligible school entities and approved by the department in an amount calculated as follows:(1) A base amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000).(2) A per-student amount calculated as follows:(i) Multiply the average daily membership in approved career and technical education programs for the most recent year available for each area career and technical school or school district that has been approved for funding by the department by the difference between the amount appropriated for career and technical education curriculum grants and the sum of the funding distributed under paragraph (1) to all area career and technical schools and school districts.(ii) Divide the product from subparagraph (i) by the sum of the average daily membership in approved career and technical education programs for the most recent year available for all area career and technical schools or school districts that have been approved for funding by the department . (c) (1) No later than sixty days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall make available an application for grants under this section.(2) The information required to be submitted on an application shall be limited to:(i) The name, address, email address and telephone number of the school entity.(ii) The name, address, email address and telephone number of an employe of the school entity who shall serve as the contact for the application.(iii) A description of the digital curriculum resources or 20260HB2425PN3226 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 platform, or written or printed curriculum resources or platform, for which the grant money will be used.(iv) The date on which the occupational advisory committee recommended the purchase under subparagraph (iii).(v) Certification by the applicant that the grant money will be used for the stated purpose.(d) (1) The department may only consider the application information submitted under subsection (c)(2) for grant approval.(2) School entities that complete the application as required under subsection (c)(2) shall be awarded a grant in the amount prescribed under subsection (b).(e) Digital, printed or written instructional platforms purchased under the program shall include common digital curriculum resources available, including:(1) Instructional strategies and guided lesson plans.(2) Multimedia instructional content.(3) Digital lessons, including e-books and digital textbooks.(4) Multiple instructional delivery methods which may include face-to-face, self-paced and distance or hybrid learning.(5) Guided projects and activities to incorporate hands-on application of skills.(6) Reporting features to provide data on student progress.(7) Guidance for students to obtain industry-recognized certifications.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2425PN3226 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Occupational advisory committee" means an occupational advisory committee established under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 339 (relating to vocational education)."Program" means the Career and Technical Education Curriculum Modernization Grant Program established under subsection (a)."School entity" means a school district or intermediate unit with an approved career and technical education program or area career and technical school located in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2425PN3226 - 4 - 1234567891011